Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 1. State Use Tax
§ 39-16-105.
Exemptions.

The following purchases or leases are exempt from the excise tax imposed by this article:

For the purpose of exempting sales of services and tangible personal property which are protected by the United States constitution and the Wyoming constitution, the following are exempt:

Purchases which the state of Wyoming is prohibited from taxing under the laws or constitutions of the United States or Wyoming.

For the purpose of exempting sales of services and tangible personal property protected by federal law, the following are exempt:

Railroad rolling stock including locomotives purchased by interstate railroads, aircraft purchased by interstate air carriers which are holders of valid United States civil aeronautics board permits or authorities, and trucks, truck-tractors, trailers, semitrailers and passenger buses in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds gross vehicle weight which are purchased by common or contract interstate carriers or which are operating in interstate commerce under exemption clauses in federal law if they are to be used in interstate commerce;

Purchases by Wyoming joint apprenticeship and training programs approved by the department of labor.

For the purpose of exempting sales of services and tangible personal property consumed in production, the following are exempt:

Purchases of tangible personal property by a person engaged in the business of manufacturing, processing or compounding when the tangible personal property purchased becomes an ingredient or component of the tangible personal property manufactured, processed or compounded for sale or use and purchases of containers, labels or shipping cases used for the tangible personal property so manufactured, processed or compounded. This subparagraph shall apply to chemicals and catalysts used directly in manufacturing, processing or compounding which are consumed or destroyed during that process;

Purchases of livestock, feeds for use in feeding livestock or poultry for marketing purposes and seeds, roots, bulbs, small plants and fertilizer planted or applied to land, the products of which are to be sold. This exemption applies to, but is not limited to, sales of seeds, roots, bulbs, small plants and fertilizer planted or applied to land subject to a state or federal crop set aside program;

Sales of fuel for use as boiler fuel in the production of electricity.

For the purpose of exempting sales of services and tangible personal property sold to government, charitable and nonprofit organizations, irrigation districts and weed and pest control districts, the following are exempt:

Purchases made by the state of Wyoming or its political subdivisions;

Purchases made by religious or charitable organizations in the conduct of their regular religious or charitable functions;

Purchases by a joint powers board organized under the Wyoming Joint Powers Act;

Labor or service charges, including transportation and travel, for the repair, alteration or improvement of real property or tangible personal property owned by, or incorporated in projects under contract to the state of Wyoming or any of its political subdivisions, including an irrigation district created under W.S.

41-7-201

through

41-7-210

, and a weed and pest control district created under W.S.

11-5-101

et seq.;

Sales to an irrigation district created under W.S.

41-7-201

through

41-7-210

;

Sales to a weed and pest control district created under W.S.

11-5-101

et seq.

For the purpose of exempting sales of services and tangible personal property which are alternatively taxed, the following are exempt:

Purchases which are taxable under the provisions of the Selective Sales Tax Act of 1937, and purchases for which a sales tax has been previously paid;

Motor vehicle fuel which is subject to taxation under W.S.

39-17-101

through

39-17-111

or

39-17-201

through

39-17-211

. The exemption provided by this subparagraph shall not apply to gasoline or gasohol taxed under W.S. 39-17-104(a)(iii) or to diesel fuel taxed under W.S. 39-17-204(a)(ii).

For the purpose of exempting sales of services and tangible personal property and services which are essential human goods and services, the following are exempt:

Purchases of the following tangible personal property sold under a prescription: drugs for human relief excluding “over-the-counter-drugs”, insulin for human relief and any syringe, needle or other device necessary for the administration thereof, oxygen for medical use, blood plasma, prosthetic devices, hearing aids, eyeglasses, contact lenses, mobility enhancing equipment, durable medical equipment and any assistive device. As used in this subparagraph, “assistive device” means any item, piece of equipment or product system, as defined by department rule, which is used to increase, maintain or improve the functional capabilities of an individual with a permanent disability, excluding any medical device, surgical device or organ implanted or transplanted into or attached directly to an individual.

Tangible personal property sold by any person for delivery in this state is deemed sold for storage, use or consumption herein and is subject to the tax imposed by this article unless the person selling the property has received from the purchaser a signed certificate stating the property was purchased for resale and showing his name and address;

Purchases of all noncapitalized equipment and disposable supplies which are used in the direct medical or dental care of a patient. The exemption in this subparagraph shall not include capitalized equipment or office supplies used in the normal course of business;

Sales of water delivered by pipeline or truck;

Purchases of food for domestic home consumption.

For the purpose of exempting sales of services provided primarily to businesses, exemptions shall be as specified by the legislature and as follows:

A person regularly engaged in the business of making loans or a supervised financial institution, as defined in W.S. 40-14-140(a)(xix), that forecloses a lien or repossesses a motor vehicle on which it has filed a lien shall not be liable for payment of sales or use tax, penalties or interest due under W.S. 39-16-108(b) and (c) for that vehicle;

The purchase of farm implements. For purposes of this subparagraph, “farm implements” means any tractor or other machinery designed or adapted and used exclusively for agricultural operations and specifically excludes any vehicle titled under chapter 2 of title 31, snowmobiles, lawn tractors, all-terrain vehicles and repair or replacement parts.

For the purpose of exempting sales of services and tangible personal property as an economic incentive, the following are exempt:

Sales of carbon dioxide and other gases used in tertiary production;

The purchase of aircraft repair, remodeling or maintenance services at a federal aviation administration certified repair station including, but not limited to, repair or replacement materials or parts;

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 41, § 2.

Until December 31, 2027, the purchase or lease of machinery to be used in this state directly and predominantly in manufacturing tangible personal property, if the sale or lease:

Is to a manufacturer classified by the department under the NAICS code manufacturing sector 31 - 33; and

Does not include noncapitalized machinery except machinery expensed in accordance with section 179 of the Internal Revenue Code.

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 33, § 2.

The purchase or lease of any aircraft used in a federal aviation administration air carrier operation including the purchase of all:

Tangible personal property permanently affixed or attached as a component part of the aircraft, including, but not limited to, repair or replacement materials or parts;

Aircraft repair, remodeling and maintenance services performed on the aircraft, its engine or its component materials or parts.

Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 120, § 1.

The purchase of equipment used to construct a new coal gasification or coal liquefaction facility. The exemption provided by this subparagraph shall be limited to the acquisition of equipment used in a project to make it operational. The exemption shall not apply to tools and other equipment used in construction of a new facility, contracted services required for construction and routine maintenance activities nor to equipment utilized or acquired after the facility is operational;

Subject to meeting the applicable provisions of this subparagraph, the following purchases by a data processing services center as defined in W.S. 39-15-101(a)(xliv):

The sales price paid for the purchase or rental of qualifying prewritten and other computer software, computer equipment including computers, servers, monitors, keyboards, storage devices, containers used to transport and house such computer equipment, and other peripherals, racking systems, cabling and trays that are necessary for the operation of a data processing services center when the aggregate purchase of the qualifying computer equipment exceeds two million dollars ($2,000,000.00) in any calendar year;

The sales price paid for the purchase or rental of qualifying uninterruptable power supplies, back-up power generators, specialized heating and air conditioning equipment and air quality control equipment used for controlling the computer environment necessary for the operation of a data processing services center when the aggregate purchase of the qualifying equipment exceeds two million dollars ($2,000,000.00) in any calendar year;

For the purpose of claiming the exemptions in subdivisions (I) and (II) of this subparagraph, the purchaser shall demonstrate to the department that he:

Has a physical location in this state where the qualifying equipment purchased shall be maintained and operated until the qualifying equipment is scheduled for replacement or until it has reached the end of its serviceable life;

Shall make an initial total capital asset investment in a physical location in this state:

a.

For the exemption in subdivision (I) of this subparagraph, of not less than five million dollars ($5,000,000.00) or has made a capital investment in a physical location in this state of not less than five million dollars ($5,000,000.00) in the five (5) years immediately preceding March 5, 2010;

b.

For the exemption in subdivision (II) of this subparagraph, of not less than fifty million dollars ($50,000,000.00) or has made a capital investment in a physical location in this state of not less than fifty million dollars ($50,000,000.00) in the five (5) years immediately preceding April 1, 2011.

Has retained adequate documentation to demonstrate that the total qualifying purchases exceed the applicable annual threshold for each exemption claimed under this subparagraph;

Has received certification from the Wyoming business council that the purchaser has created or will create a number of jobs in Wyoming that is appropriate to the size and stage of development of the data processing services center as determined by the Wyoming business council;

Will accrue the excise tax on otherwise qualifying purchases where the applicable annual threshold was not met. The tax shall be remitted to the department not later than the end of January immediately following the end of the calendar year where the threshold was not met to avoid the assessment of penalty and interest on any amount of tax due;

Shall keep adequate written records and documentation in accordance with department rule and regulation to show compliance with the requirements of this subparagraph. If the purchaser does not meet all the requirements of this subparagraph, any tax owed shall be remitted to the department not later than the end of January immediately following the end of the calendar year in which the requirements were not met.

For the purpose of claiming the exemptions in subdivisions (I) and (II) of this subparagraph, for data centers where one (1) or more entities occupies the facility, the purchaser shall demonstrate that all the requirements of subdivision (III) are met in the aggregate by the entities occupying the facility regardless of multiple ownerships of equipment and buildings.

Purchase of and retail commissions on lottery tickets or shares and equipment necessary to operate a lottery under W.S.

9-17-101

through

9-17-128

;

Purchases of equipment by a telecommunications service provider, video programming service provider or provider of internet access used to provide broadband internet service in an unserved area. A telecommunications service provider, video programming service provider or provider of internet access may allocate the purchase price of equipment using any reasonable method, instead of specific geographic accounting, if the method is consistently used by the provider and supported by verifiable data that reasonably reflects the location where the equipment is used. The definitions in W.S. 39-15-105(a)(viii)(U)(II) shall apply to this subparagraph. This subparagraph is repealed effective July 1, 2024.

W.S. 39-15-108(b)(ii) and 39-15-107(b)(iv) apply to use taxes under this article;

For the purpose of avoiding application of the use tax more than once on the same article of tangible property for the same taxpayer:

The trade-in value of tangible personal property shall be excluded from the sales price of new tangible personal property when trade-in and purchase occur in one (1) transaction; and

The purchase price paid for a motor vehicle, house trailer, trailer coach, trailer or semitrailer as defined in W.S.

31-1-101

if the vehicle is purchased by a nonresident of Wyoming and the vehicle is to be removed from the state of Wyoming within thirty (30) days of purchase. The purchaser shall declare under penalty of perjury on a form prescribed by the department that he is not a resident of Wyoming.

The Wyoming business council and the department of revenue shall jointly report to the joint revenue interim committee on or before December 1 of each year that the exemption provided by subparagraph (a)(viii)(D), (F), (G), (H) or (K) of this section is in effect. If requested by the department of revenue, any person utilizing the exemption under subparagraph (a)(viii)(D) of this section shall report to the department the amount of use tax exempted, and the number of jobs created or impacted by the utilization of the exemption. The report shall evaluate the cumulative effects of each exemption that is in effect from initiation of the exemption and shall include:

A history of employment in terms of numbers of employees, full-time and part-time employees and rates of turnover classified by the 2007 edition, as amended, of the North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) code manufacturing section 31 - 33 from information collected by the department of workforce services;

A history of wages and benefits disaggregated by gender for each job category; and

A comprehensive history of taxes paid to the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 43, § 1; ch. 110, § 1; 1999, ch. 39, § 1; ch. 58, § 2; ch. 86, § 1; 2000, ch. 44, § 1; 2001, ch. 119, § 1; ch. 147, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 48, § 2; 2003, ch. 20, § 1; ch. 77, § 1; ch. 133, § 1; ch. 175, § 1; ch. 202, § 1; ch. 203, § 1; 2004, ch. 27, § 1; 2005, ch. 5, § 2; ch. 136, § 1; ch. 209, § 1; 2006, ch. 14, § 1; 2007, ch. 140, § 1; ch. 188, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 1; 2009, ch. 117, § 1; ch. 189, § 1; 2010, ch. 33, §§ 1, 2; ch. 50, § 1; 2011, ch. 48, § 1; ch. 83, § 1; 2012, ch. 1, § 1; 2013 ch. 29, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2015 ch. 120, § 1, effective March 3, 2015; 2017 ch. 181, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 41, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 120, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, inserted (a)(viii)(D).

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 5, § 2, rewrote the first sentence in (a)(vi)(A).

Laws 2005, ch. 5, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 15, 2005.

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 136, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, rewrote (a)(viii)(B), moving some of the provisions to new (a)(viii)(E), and deleting obsolete provisions.

The third 2005 amendment, by ch. 209, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, and repealed effective July 1, 2015, added (a)(viii)(E) (redesignated as (a)(viii)(F) at the direction of the legislative service office).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2006 amendment,

added (a)(viii)(G).

Laws 2006, ch. 14, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved 9, 2006.

The 2007 amendments. —

The first 2007 amendment, by ch. 140, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, inserted (a)(vi)(E).

The second 2007 amendment, by ch. 188, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, substituted “2012” for “2008” in (a)(viii)(C).

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

The 2008 amendment,

added (b).

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, by Laws 2009, ch. 117, § 1, substituted “applicable as follows:” for “repealed effective June 30, 2012;” in the introductory language of (a)(viii)(C); and added (a)(viii)(C)(I) and (a)(viii)(C)(II).

Laws 2009, ch. 117, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2009.

The second 2009 amendment, by Laws 2009, ch. 189, § 1, effective July 1, 2009, added (a)(x)(B).

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

The 2010 amendments. —

The first 2010 amendment, by ch. 33, §§ 1, 2, in (a)(viii)(D), substituted “2011” for “2010”; repealed former (a)(viii)(D)(III), which read: “Is completed in the case of a sale, or executed in the case of a lease, on or after July 1, 2004”; and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2010, ch. 33 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2010.

The second 2010 amendment, by ch. 50, § 1, added (a)(viii)(H); and in the introductory language of (b), substituted “, (G) or (H) of this section” for “or (G) of this section.”

Laws 2010, ch. 50, § 2, makes the
act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for
a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2010.

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2011 amendments. —

The first 2011 amendment, by ch. 48 § 1, in (a)(viii)(H), inserted the introductory language, and redesignated the existing provisions as (a)(viii)(H)(I) and (a)(viii)(H)(III); in (a)(viii)(H)(I), inserted “prewritten and other computer software” and “containers used to transport and house such computer equipment”; added (a)(viii)(H)(II) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; in (a)(viii)(H)(III), substituted “the exemptions in subdivisions (I) and (II) of this subparagraph” for “this exemption”; in (a)(viii)(H)(III)(1), deleted “computer” preceding “equipment” twice; in (a)(viii)(H)(III)(2)(a), inserted “For the exemption in subdivision (I) of this subparagraph,” and substituted “March 5, 2010” for “the effective date of this subparagraph”; added (a)(viii)(H)(III)(2)(b); in (a)(viii)(H)(III)(3), substituted “qualifying purchases exceed” for “purchase of qualifying computer equipment exceeds,” inserted “applicable” preceding “annual,” and substituted “for each exemption claimed under this subparagraph” for “of two million dollars ($2,000,000.00)”; in (a)(viii)(H)(III)(4), deleted “annual” preceding “certification”; in (a)(viii)(H)(III)(5), deleted “purchase of” following “excise tax on,” substituted “purchases” for “computer equipment,” inserted “applicable,” and deleted “of two million dollars ($2,000,000.00)” following “threshold” in the first sentence; added (a)(viii)(H)(IV); and made related changes.

Laws 2011, ch. 48 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2011.

The second 2011 amendment, by ch. 83 § 1, effective July 1, 2011, in the introductory language of (a)(viii)(D), substituted “2017” for “2011”; in the introductory language of (b), added the present second sentence; and in (b)(i), added “classified by the 2007 edition, as amended, of the North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) code manufacturing section 31 – 33 from information collected by the department of employment” at the end.

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” at the end of (b)(i).

The 2013 amendments. —

The first
2013 amendment, by ch. 29 § 1, effective July 1, 2013, added “one (1) or” following “data centers where” and substituted “entities” for “than one (1) entity,” and deleted “but offer data services as a single entity” in (a)(viii)(H)(IV).

The second 2013 amendment, by ch. 200 § 1, effective July 1, 2013, added (a)(viii)(J).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2015 amendment,

in (a)(viii)(F), substituted “July 1, 2021” for “July 1, 2015”; and in the first sentence in (b), substituted “subparagraph (a)(viii)(D), (F), (G) or (H)” for “subparagraph (a)(viii)(D), (G) or (H).”

Laws 2015, ch. 120, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

by ch. 120, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, repealed former (a)(viii)(F), which read, “Purchases of tangible personal property or services performed for the repair, assembly, alteration or improvement of railroad rolling stock. This subparagraph is repealed effective July 1, 2021.”

The 2017 amendments. —

The first 2017 amendment, by ch. 41, § 2, effective July 1, 2017, deleted former (a)(viii)(C).

The second 2017 amendment, by ch. 181, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in the introductory language of (a)(viii)(D) substituted “December 31, 2027” for “December 31, 2017.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (a)(viii)(K); and in the introductory language in (b), substituted "(G), (H) or (K)" for "(G) or (H)."

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 43, § 1 and 2, and ch. 110, § 1, amended W.S. 39-6-405, which was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. The amendments to § 39-6-405 were subsequently incorporated into this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

There is no subsection (b) or subparagraphs (a)(i)(B), (a)(viii)(l) or (a)(x)(B) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2004, ch. 27, § 2, directs the Wyoming business council and the department of revenue to jointly report on or before December 1 of each year the exemption provided by the act is in effect to the joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee and the joint revenue interim committee. The report is to evaluate the cumulative effects of the exemption from initiation of the exemption and should include a history of employment in terms of numbers of employees, full-time and part-time employees, and rate of turnover; a history of wages and benefits disaggregated by gender for each job category; and a comprehensive history of taxes paid to the state of Wyoming.

Laws 2005, ch. 136, § 1, and Laws 2005, ch. 209, § 1, both added a new subparagraph (E) to § 39-16-105(a)(viii). The subparagraph added by ch. 209 has been redesignated as subparagraph (F) at the direction of the legislative service office.

Laws 2006, ch. 14, § 2, provides:

“(a)

The Wyoming business council and the department of revenue shall jointly report on or before December 1 of each year the exemption provided by this act is in effect to the joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee and the joint revenue interim committee. The report shall evaluate the cumulative effects of the exemption from initiation of the exemption and shall include:

“(i)

A history of employment in the coal gasification and coal liquefaction industry in terms of numbers of employees, full-time and part-time employees, and rate of turnover;

“(ii)

A history of wages and benefits disaggregated by gender for each job category; and

“(iii)

A comprehensive history of taxes paid to the state of Wyoming by companies in the coal gasification and coal liquefaction industry.”

Laws 2011, ch. 48, § 2, provides:

“(a)

If requested by the department of revenue, any person utilizing the exemption shall report to the department annually the amount of excise tax exempted under W.S. 39-15-105(a)(viii)(S) and 39-16-105(a)(viii)(H). The department shall report the total dollars under this exemption to the Wyoming business council. The council shall report to the joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee and the joint revenue interim committee on or before December 1 every four (4) years on the total amount of taxes exempted, the number of jobs created or impacted by the utilization of the exemption. The report shall evaluate the cumulative effects of the exemption that is in effect from initiation of the exemption and shall include:

“(i)

A history of employment in terms of numbers of employees, full-time and part-time employees and rates of turnover classified by the 2007 edition of the North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) code, as amended, data processing section 518210 from information collected by the department of employment;

“(ii)

A history of employment in terms of numbers of employees, full-time and part-time employees and rates of turnover;

“(iii)

A comprehensive history of taxes paid to the state of Wyoming, including any property taxes paid.”

Wyoming Joint Powers Act. —

See §§

16-1-102

and 16-1-103(a)(ii).

Selective Sales Tax Act of 1937. —

See § 39-15-102(a).

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2005, ch. 209, § 2, directs the Wyoming business council and the department of revenue to jointly report on or before December 1 of each year the exemption provided by this act is in effect to the joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee and the joint revenue interim committee. The report is to evaluate the cumulative effects of the exemption from initiation of the exemption and should include: (1) a history of employment in the railroad rolling stock industry in terms of numbers of employees, full-time and part-time employees, and rate of turnover; (2) a history of wages and benefits disaggregated by gender for each job category; and (3) a comprehensive history of taxes paid to the state of Wyoming by companies in the railroad rolling stock industry.

Intent of use tax. —

The use tax was intended to supplement or complement the sales tax. Continental Supply Co. v. People, 54 Wyo. 185, 88 P.2d 488,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1939).

Use tax is complementary to the sales tax, intended to apply to sales of goods bought outside state and brought into state, so as to be put on equal footing with goods subject to sales tax. Morrison-Knudson Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 58 Wyo. 500, 135 P.2d 927,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1943).

“Manufacture”

as used in this section has reference to one who manufactures and sells his products, and not to one who consumes them. Morrison-Knudson Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 58 Wyo. 500, 135 P.2d 927,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1943).

“Manufactured articles” intended to be exempt are those articles sold in commerce.

Morrison-Knudson Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 58 Wyo. 500, 135 P.2d 927,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1943).

Contractor installing own materials liable for taxes. —

A contractor who sold materials directly to a tax-exempt hospital, and then installed the materials pursuant to a separate contract for labor services made between the contractor and a contract manager employed by the hospital, was considered to be the user or consumer of the materials and was liable for sales or use taxes. Memorial Hosp. of Laramie County v. Department of Revenue & Taxation, 805 P.2d 276,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1991).

Supplying labor and materials to political subdivisions. —

The legislature intended no exemption to apply to contractors who supply both labor and materials to exempt political subdivisions of the state. Sublette County Sch. Dist. No. 1 v. Sublette County Sch. Dist. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 770 P.2d 218,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1989).

Legal doctrine of “primary use,” with respect to the determination of exemptions,

comes into play only in situations where there is more than one distinct and independent use. In re Use Tax Assessment, 491 P.2d 1232,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 272

(Wyo. 1971).

No tax absent “first use” in Wyoming. —

The decision to impose a use tax on new parts used to repair a railroad's wheel assemblies was not in accordance with law, where the “first use” of the new repair parts took place in Nebraska and not in Burlington N. R.R. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 820 P.2d 993,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 1991).

Sending supervisor into state not “doing business.” —

Sending an engineer into the state for the purpose of supervising the installation of equipment is merely incidental to interstate commerce, and does not constitute “doing business” in this state. Creamery Package Mfg. Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 62 Wyo. 265, 166 P.2d 952,

1946 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1946).

Goods purchasable in state. —

Mining machinery not generally stocked in state and bought outside state for use in Wyoming but which at time of purchase was promptly purchasable in Wyoming through regularly established agency was not exempt from use tax under this article. Manning & Martin, Inc. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 58 Wyo. 425, 133 P.2d 373,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1943).

Competitive baseball activities for youth deemed “charitable.” —

A nonprofit corporation promoting and financing competitive baseball activities for youth qualified as a “charitable” organization, where all young persons who desired an opportunity to play organized baseball were allowed the chance to try out for a team. Department of Revenue & Taxation v. Casper Legion Baseball Club, 767 P.2d 608,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1989).

Quoted

in

State Bd. of Equalization v. Cheyenne Newspapers, Inc., 611 P.2d 805,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1980); United Pac. Ins. Co. v. Wyoming Excise Tax Div., 713 P.2d 217,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 456

(Wyo. 1986); Memorial Hosp. v. Department of Revenue & Taxation, 770 P.2d 223,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 1989).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Personal Liability for Directors of Nonprofit Corporations in Wyoming,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 273 (1983).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Use tax as within tax exemption provisions of statutes other than those imposing such taxes, 1 ALR2d 465.

Items or materials exempt from use tax as used in manufacturing, processing or the like, 30 ALR2d 1439.

Validity of use tax exemption having no complementary exemption under sales tax, 85 ALR2d 1043.

Exemption of casual, isolated or occasional sales under sales and use taxes, 42 ALR3d 292.

Religious organization's exemption from sales or use tax, 54 ALR3d 1204.

Sales or use tax upon containers or packaging materials purchased by manufacturer or processor for use with goods he distributes, 4 ALR4th 581.

Cable television equipment or services as subject to sales or use tax, 5 ALR4th 754.

Exemption, from sales or use tax, of water, oil, gas, other fuel, or electricity provided for residential purposes, 15 ALR4th 269.

What constitutes newspapers, magazines, periodicals or the like, under sales or use tax law exemption, 25 ALR4th 750.

Mining exemption to sales or use tax, 47 ALR4th 1229.

Validity, construction and application of state laws imposing tax or license fee on possession, sale or the like, or illegal narcotics, 12 ALR5th 89.

Architectural drawings or illustrations as exempt from sales or use tax, 27 ALR5th 794.

Sales and use tax exemption for medical supplies, 30 ALR5th 494.

Exemption of charitable or educational organization from sales or use tax, 69 ALR5th 477.

Parts and supplies used in repair as subject to sales and use taxes, 113 ALR5th 313.

§ 39-16-106.
Licenses; permits.

Every vendor shall register with the department of revenue, giving the name and address of all agents operating in the state and the location of all places of business together with other information as required by the department. Effective July 1, 1997, a license fee of sixty dollars ($60.00) shall be required from each new vendor, except for any remote vendor who has no requirement to register in this state, or who is using one (1) of the technology models pursuant to the streamlined sales and use tax agreement. Failure of a vendor to timely file any return may result in forfeiture of the license granted under this section. The department shall charge sixty dollars ($60.00) for reinstatement of any forfeited license. Any out-of-state vendor not otherwise subject to this article may voluntarily register with the department and if registered, shall collect and remit the state use tax imposed by W.S.

39-16-104

.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, and pursuant to department rules and regulations, a vendor who purchases wholesale goods for use in manufacturing, processing or compounding as provided by W.S. 39-16-105(a)(viii), and who does not engage in any retail sale of those goods, shall not be required to obtain a use tax registration.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2001, ch. 147, § 2; 2008, ch. 34, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “or who is using one (1) of the technology models pursuant to the streamlined sales and use tax agreement” for “and who is using one (1) of the technology models pursuant to W.S. 39 15 401, et seq” at the end of the second sentence of (a).

Laws 2008, ch. 34, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2008.